Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.350

Examinations—Sanitary and health practices and standards—Rules.

The director shall adopt rules regarding sanitary practices, health practices and standards, and the examination of animals at public livestock markets.

[ 2003 c 326 s 83; 1959 c 107 s 35.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.